District of Columbia statutes.
7-2857

Nonseverability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held to be unconstitutional, beyond the statutory authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, or otherwise invalid, then all provisions of this chapter shall be deemed invalid.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-272, § 8, 48 DCR 1633